tests/runtime/test.sbl
// Test `test`.

externals (stem)

strings (s)

define stem as (
  backwards (
    $(cursor == 2) or fail='backwards failed to swap cursor and limit'
    test (
      ='juggernaut'
      $(cursor == 10) or fail='string= failed to update cursor'
      next or fail='next failed'
    )
    $(cursor == 10) or fail='test failed to restore cursor'
  )

  ='ok'
)
